Idaho statutes. Title 55 PROPERTY IN GENERAL
Chapter 7
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

Sec.

§ 55-701. By whom taken

Any place within state. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-110.

§ 55-702. By whom taken

Within limited territory. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-110.

§ 55-703. By whom taken

Outside of state. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-111.

§ 55-704. By whom taken

Outside United States. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-114.

§ 55-705. By whom taken

Members of the armed forces. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-113.

§ 55-706. Acknowledgment before deputies. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116A.

§ 55-707. Requisites of acknowledgment. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-105.

§ 55-707A. Acknowledgment by entity on behalf of another entity. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116A.

§ 55-708. Acknowledgment by married woman. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-709. Certificate of acknowledgment. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-115.

§ 55-710. Form of certificate. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116.

§ 55-711. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by corporation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116A.

§ 55-711A. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by limited liability company. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116A.

§ 55-712. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by attorney. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116A.

§ 55-712A. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by person signing by mark. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-712B. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by person physically unable to sign or sign by mark. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-109.

§ 55-713. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by official or fiduciary. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116A.

§ 55-714. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by partnership. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116.

§ 55-715. Form of certificate

Acknowledgment by state or political subdivision. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116.

§ 55-716. Authentication of certificate. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116.

§ 55-717. Certificate of justice

Authentication. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2012, ch. 20, § 24, effective July 1, 2012.

§ 55-718. Proof of execution. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 51-116.

§ 55-719. Identity of witness must be known or proved. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 51-106 and 51-107.

§ 55-720. Proof of identity of grantor. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-721. Proof of instrument by handwriting. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-722. Proof of instrument by handwriting

What evidence must prove. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-723. Certificate of proof. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-724. Authority of officers taking proof. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-725. Correction of defective certificate. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-726. Action to prove instrument. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-727. Judgment entitles instrument to record. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-728. Prior instruments not affected. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-729. Record of prior instruments. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 55-730. Record of prior instruments as notice. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.